Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB553.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "doula" means a trained professional who provides
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not medical care, to women
before, during, and after childbirth.
(2) The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with
whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide
coverage for doula services if the doula has:
(a) Applied for and received a National Provider Identification Number from
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; and
(b) Completed enrollment as a Medicaid provider, as may be required by the
Department for Medicaid Services.
(3) The Department for Medicaid Services shall:
(a) Prior to enrolling doulas as Medicaid providers and in collaboration with
the Doula Advisory Council established in Section 2 of this Act, establish
training and credentialing requirements for doulas; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 194A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Doula Advisory Council is hereby established withing the Department for
Public Health.
(2) The council shall consist of the following nineteen (19) members:
(a) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her
designee who shall serve as chair of the council;
Page 1 of 4
BR151500.100 - 1515 - XXXX 2/18/2025 4:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1515
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental
and Intellectual Disabilities or his or her designee;
(c) The director of the Division of Maternal and Child Health or his or her
designee;
(d) The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Health Plans or his
or her designee;
(e) Seven (7) individuals appointed by the commissioner of the Department for
Public Health of which one (1) shall be:
1. A mother who has used doula services for at least two (2) child
birthday;
2. A certified nurse midwife;
3. A certified professional midwife;
4. A representative of the Kentucky Hospital Association selected from a
list of three names provided by the Kentucky Hospital Association;
5. An obstetrician with demonstrated work-related experience in
community, health equity and training in equitable healthcare
practices; and
6. A representative of a community-based maternal and child health
organization; and
(f) Eight (8) individuals who are actively practicing as doulas in the
Commonwealth appoint by the commissioner of the Department for Public
Health of which:
1. One (1) shall reside in and represent each of the eight (8) federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services regions in Kentucky; and
2. At least one (1) shall be a doula with lactation training.
(3) Members of the council who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for
necessary and actual expenses.
Page 2 of 4
BR151500.100 - 1515 - XXXX 2/18/2025 4:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1515
(4) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times as it determines may
be necessary to perform its duties. A majority of the members shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of the council's business.
(5) The duties of the council shall include:
(a) Making recommendations to the Department for Medicaid Services for:
1. Training, credentialing, and continuing education standards to be
required for a doula to be eligible for Medicaid enrollment;
2. Standards for recognizing doula training curricula that may be
sufficient to satisfy training, credentialing, and continuing education
requirements; and
3. Establishing scope of practice for doulas including prenatal and
postnatal services and labor and delivery support;
(b) Conducting a continuous review of doula training programs; and
(c) Advising the Department for Public Health on:
1. Increasing access to education and resources for pregnant women and
their families;
2. Improving access to doula services; and
3. Furthering interagency efforts to address maternal health disparities.
(6) In make recommendations to the Department for Medicaid Services for training
and credentialing requirements as required under subsection (5)(a) of this
section, the council shall consider both formal training programs and previous
experience an individual may have as a doula or in providing doula services.
Section 3. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 1 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request any necessary
Page 3 of 4
BR151500.100 - 1515 - XXXX 2/18/2025 4:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1515
state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay full
implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Section 4. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 3 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and shall provide an update on the status of any application
or request submitted pursuant to Section 3 of this Act at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission or any committee thereof.
Page 4 of 4
BR151500.100 - 1515 - XXXX 2/18/2025 4:43 PM Jacketed